Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-102
Legislative policy.

The Legislature declares that it is the policy of the state to:

(1) Preserve affordable telecommunications services;

(2) Maintain and advance the efficiency and availability of telecommunications services;

(3) Ensure that consumers pay only reasonable charges for telecommunications services;

(4) Promote diversity in the supply of telecommunications services and products throughout the state; and

(5) Promote fair competition in all Nebraska telecommunications markets in a manner consistent with the federal act.

Laws 1986, LB 835, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 660, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-801;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 3.

Sections 86-801 to 86-811 (recodified in 2002 as provisions of the Nebraska Telecommunications Regulatory Act, sections 86-101 to 86-163) apply only to common carriers. Nebraska Pub. Serv. Comm. v. Nebraska Pub. Power Dist., 256 Neb. 479, 590 N.W.2d 840 (1999).

Sections 86-801 to 86-811 (recodified in 2002 as provisions of the Nebraska Telecommunications Regulatory Act, sections 86-101 to 86-163) are constitutional. State ex rel. Spire v. Northwestern Bell Tel. Co., 233 Neb. 262, 445 N.W.2d 284 (1989).